Vermont, session 2025-2026, H84.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 9361 is amended to read:
§ 9361. HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS DELIVERING HEALTH CARE
SERVICES THROUGH TELEMEDICINE OR BY STORE-AND-
FORWARD MEANS
* * *
(d) Neither a health care provider nor a patient shall create or cause to be
created a recording of a provider’s telemedicine consultation with a patient
unless both the patient and the provider consent to the recording.
* * *
Sec. 2. 18 V.S.A. § 9362 is amended to read:
§ 9362. HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS DELIVERING HEALTH CARE
SERVICES BY AUDIO-ONLY TELEPHONE
* * *
(d) Neither a health care provider nor a patient shall create or cause to be
created a recording of a provider’s telephone consultation with a patient unless
both the patient and the provider consent to the recording.
* * *
VT LEG #389068 v.1

No. 80 Page 2 of 2
2026
Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: April 20, 2026
VT LEG #389068 v.1